Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 54 Education of Limited English Proficient Students
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-54-1.
Declaration of policy.

The Rhode Island Constitution recognizes the diffusion of knowledge as essential to the preservation of the rights and liberties of all the people and places the responsibility on the general assembly to promote public schools and to adopt all means deemed necessary and proper to secure to the people the advantages and opportunities of education. As this responsibility relates to limited English proficient students, the state asserts that these students shall be provided with appropriate programs and services which will make their educational opportunities equal to their English dominant peers. Programs or services developed by local schools must, at the very least, provide for the attainment of English language proficiency and academic achievement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 286, § 2.

16-54-2.
Duty of the school committee.

In any city or town where there is a child who is eligible to attend elementary or secondary schools, and whose English proficiency is limited to such a degree that it impedes his or her academic progress, the school committee of the city or town shall provide those special services and programs which satisfy the needs of the child with limited English proficiency, in any programs and services as approved by the department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 286, § 2.

16-54-3.
Regulation of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

It shall be the duty of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education to establish and promulgate regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this chapter. These regulations shall include, but are not limited to:

Criteria for the identification, assessment, placement, and exiting of eligible students;

Criteria for an appropriate educational program or service;

Criteria for the monitoring and evaluation of educational programs;

Administrative procedures for state reimbursement of approved programs and services;

Definitions of responsibilities of the local school committees and the department of elementary and secondary education;

Criteria for parent involvement;

Time line for phasing in services and programs to assure that the process begins and that all eligible children are served.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 51.

16-54-4.
Reimbursement by the state.

Each school district shall be reimbursed for expenditures for direct services and instructional programs. Reimbursement shall be made when these services and programs have been carried out in accordance with the requirements of state law and the board of regents’ regulations relating to programs and services for limited English proficient students.

For each fiscal year the following formula shall be used to distribute aid for limited English proficient students:

The following formula and definitions are to be used to determine the entitlement for each school district for students in programs or services for the limited-English proficient:

In the formula in subsection (b)(1) the terms have the following meanings:

“Incentive entitlement” means the sum payable to a local school district under this formula.

“Net local cost for limited English proficient programs statewide” means the total net instructional expenditure in the reference year defined in §

16-7-16

of local schools for the support of programs, or service for limited English proficient students, including the funds distributed pursuant to this chapter, as the sum is determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. Federal funds shall be excluded from reimbursement.

“Full time equivalency students” means that time spent by students in an approval program or service reimbursable under this chapter divided by the amount of time in a normal school day.

“Share ratio” means the effective share ratio as calculated under §

16-7-20

.

No school district shall receive for limited English proficient students more than one hundred percent (100%) of its expenditures in the reference year from a combination of state operations aid as calculated in accordance with §§

16-7-15

through

16-7-34

and reimbursement aid for limited English proficient students as calculated in accordance with this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 7 of this title, for each fiscal year not more than five percent (5%) of the funds appropriated under this chapter should be used for departmental expenditures for the administration of this chapter.

If the sum appropriated by the state in any fiscal year for making payments to the cities and towns under this chapter are not sufficient to pay in full the total amount which all cities and towns are entitled to receive for the fiscal year, the maximum amount which all cities and towns are entitled to receive for the fiscal year is to be ratably reduced. In any given year the appropriation for implementation of this chapter shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).

Reimbursement payments as calculated under this chapter shall be made according to §

16-7-17

. All payments under this chapter shall be used exclusively to support programs and services for limited English proficient students.

Expenditure reports shall be submitted by the local school districts to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in accordance with rules and regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. The commissioner shall make an annual financial and program evaluation report to the legislature on the status of state and local efforts.

Net local cost for Resident full- limited English time equivalent proficient students X limited English X Share ratio = Incentive (statewide) student's district district entitlement Full-time equivalent limited English proficient students (statewide)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 59; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 51.

16-54-5.
State advisory council.

A state advisory council shall be established by the department of elementary and secondary education. The council shall be comprised of twenty-one (21) members, one of whom shall be the chairperson of the house finance committee or his or her designee; one of whom shall be the chairperson of the senate finance committee or his or her designee; all others shall be appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and be representative of the significant segments of the limited English proficient population of the state or have demonstrated an interest in the education of the limited English proficient population. In appointing members to the state advisory council, the commissioner shall ensure equal access and opportunity for participation to all interested parties. Members of the state advisory council shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner, serve without compensation, and be residents of the state. The advisory council shall advise the commissioner on all matters pertaining to the education of limited English proficient students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 286, § 2.